Rhode Island, session 2025, SB85.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
GROCERY STORES
6-61-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Grocery store" means a retail store in the State of Rhode Island that earns the majority
of its gross income from the retail sale of groceries and sells primarily household foodstuffs for off-
site consumption, including the sale of fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy
products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked goods or prepared foods. Other household
supplies or other products shall be secondary to the primary purpose of food sales.
(2) "Manual checkout station" provides human assistance to shoppers, scanning, bagging
and accepting payment for their purchases.
(3) "Retail sale" means the sale of groceries to a consumer for use or consumption, and not
for the purpose of resale.
(4) "Self-service checkout" means an automated process that enable shoppers to scan, bag
and pay for their purchases without human assistance.
6-61-2. Restriction on number of self-service checkouts in grocery stores.

Grocery stores shall not have more than six (6) self-service checkout stations operating at
any one time per location.
6-61-3. Minimum manual checkout.
Grocery stores with self-checkout stations shall have a minimum of one operational manual
checkout station per two (2) self-service checkout stations.
6-61-4. Enforcement.
(a) The consumer protection unit of the department of attorney general ("CPU") shall have
primary authority to enforce the restrictions of this chapter.
(b) The CPU shall enact rules and regulations as necessary to implement this chapter. The
fine for the first and second violations shall be five hundred ($500) dollars. The fine for third and
subsequent violations shall be one thousand ($1,000) dollars.
(c) Any employee alleging retaliation by their employer for making a complaint alleging
violations of this chapter may bring a cause of action in superior court pursuant to chapter 50 of
title 28.
(d) Any Rhode Island consumer alleging a violation of this chapter may file a complaint
with the CPU.
6-61-5. Severability.
If any part, section or provision of this chapter is found unconstitutional, illegal or invalid,
such a finding will affect only that part, section or provision of this chapter and the remaining parts,
sections or provisions shall remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000406/SUB A
========
LC000406/SUB A - Page 2 of 3